New York, session 2025-2026, A3387.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 11 of section 14-200-a of the 2 election law, as added by section 4 of part ZZZ of chapter 58 of the 3 laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) "matchable contribution" means a contribution not less than five 5 dollars and [not more than] up to two hundred fifty dollars of any 6 contribution over such amount, for a candidate for public office to be 7 voted on by the voters of the entire state or for nomination to any such 8 office, a contribution for any covered elections held in the same 9 election cycle, made by a natural person who is a resident in the state 10 of New York to a participating candidate, and for a candidate for 11 election to the state assembly or state senate or for nomination to any 12 such office, a contribution for any covered elections held in the same 13 election cycle, made by a natural person who is also a resident of such 14 state assembly or state senate district from which such candidate is 15 seeking nomination or election, that has been reported in full to the 16 PCFB in accordance with sections 14-102 and 14-104 of this article by 17 the candidate's authorized committee and has been contributed on or 18 before the day of the applicable primary, general, runoff, or special 19 election. Any contribution, contributions, or a portion of a contrib- 20 ution determined to be invalid for matching funds by the PCFB may not be 21 treated as a matchable contribution for any purpose. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07277-01-5